Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Worcester County Sheriff’s
Office shall establish a sick leave bank for Stephen Brophy, an employee of the Worcester
County Sheriff’s Office. Any employee of the Worcester County Sheriff’s Office may
voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by
Stephen Brophy. If Stephen Brophy terminates employment with the Worcester County Sheriff’s
Office or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall
be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave
bank as determined by the Worcester County Sheriff’s Office.
of 1